Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-5,223
Alternative inspections; requirements.

(1) No inspection shall be required under the Conveyance Safety Act when an owner or user of a conveyance:

(a) Obtains and submits to the State Fire Marshal a certificate of inspection from a third-party inspection company;

(b) Obtains a policy of insurance upon the conveyance from a licensed insurance company;

(c) Files a statement that such conveyance is insured; and

(d) Pays an administrative fee established pursuant to section 81-5,214.

(2) No inspection shall be required under the act when there has been an annual inspection under a city ordinance which meets the standards of the act.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2514;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 59;

Laws 2025, LB415, § 26.